Washington statutes.
RCW 15.08.110

Sale proceeds—Deficiency—Action to recover.

Such sales may be either at public auction or private sale, whichever, in the sound discretion of the officer, will be to the best interests of the state and owner of the property. The proceeds thereof shall be applied to payment of: First, costs of sale; second, expenses of disinfection; third, accrued transportation and storage charges. The balance, if any, shall be paid to the owner.

Should such proceeds be insufficient to pay the costs of sale and expenses of disinfection, the deficiency may be recovered from the owner or person in charge in an action brought in the name of the state on the relation of the director by the prosecuting attorney of the county when directed to do so by the attorney general.

[ 1961 c 11 s 15.08.110. Prior: 1915 c 166 s 12, part; RRS s 2850, part.]